Nevada, session 83, AB435.
DO ENACT AS FOLLOWS:
Section 1. Chapter 387 of NRS is hereby amended by adding
thereto a new section to read as follows:
1. The State Public Charter School Facility Fund is hereby
created in the State Treasury, to be administered by the Executive
Director of the State Public Charter School Authority. All money
received and held by the State Treasurer for the purpose of the
Fund must be deposited in the Fund.
2. The Executive Director may accept gifts and grants from
any source for deposit in the Fund.
3. The money in the Fund must be invested as the money in
other state funds is invested. All interest and income earned on
money in the Fund must be credited to the Fund.
4. Claims against the Fund must be paid as other claims
against the State are paid.
5. Money in the Fund does not revert to the State General
Fund at the end of the fiscal year, and the balance in the Fund
must be carried forward to the next fiscal year.
6. Money in the Fund must be used for the payment of
interest and redemption of outstanding bonds issued pursuant to
subsection 7.
7. The Executive Director may request that the State Board of
Finance issue bonds, secured by the money in and revenue of the
Fund, to finance:
(a) The construction, design or purchase of new and existing
buildings for a charter school, including, without limitation,
teacherages, dormitories, dining halls, gymnasiums and stadiums.
(b) Projects to enlarge, remodel or repair existing buildings or
grounds for a charter school, including, without limitation,
teacherages, dormitories, dining halls, gymnasiums and stadiums.
(c) The acquiring of sites for building charter schools, or
additional real property for necessary purposes related to charter
schools, including, without limitation, playgrounds, athletic fields
and sites for stadiums.
-
*AB435*

– 3 –
(d) The rental or lease of buildings or grounds from a public
or private landlord for a charter school.
8. The provisions of the State Securities Law contained in
chapter 349 of NRS apply to the issuance of bonds pursuant to this
section.
9. The State Board of Finance, before issuing bonds
pursuant to subsection 7, must determine that sufficient revenue
will be available in the Fund to pay the interest and installments of
principal as they become due.
10. A charter school sponsored by the State Public Charter
School Authority may apply to the Authority for financial
assistance from the proceeds of bonds issued pursuant to
subsection 7 for one of the purposes described in that subsection.
11. The State Public Charter School Authority may adopt
regulations to carry out the provisions of this section.
Sec. 2. NRS 387.195 is hereby amended to read as follows:
387.195 1. Each board of county commissioners shall levy a
tax of 75 cents on each $100 of assessed valuation of taxable
property within the county for the support of the public schools.
2. The tax collected pursuant to subsection 1 on any assessed
valuation attributable to the net proceeds of minerals must not be
considered as available to pay liabilities of the fiscal year in which
the tax is collected but must be deferred for use in the subsequent
fiscal year.
3. In addition to any tax levied in accordance with subsection
1, each board of county commissioners [shall] :
(a) Shall levy a tax for the payment of interest and redemption
of outstanding bonds of the county school district [.] ; and
(b) May levy a tax for the payment of interest and redemption
of outstanding bonds issued pursuant to section 1 of this act with
respect to a charter school in the county.
4. The tax collected pursuant to subsection 1 and any interest
earned from the investment of the proceeds of that tax must be
remitted by the county treasurer to the State Treasurer for credit to
the State Education Fund.
5. The tax collected pursuant to paragraph (a) of subsection 3
and any interest earned from the investment of the proceeds of that
tax must be credited to the county school district’s debt service
fund. The tax collected pursuant to paragraph (b) of subsection 3
and any interest from the investment of the proceeds must be
remitted to the State Treasurer for credit to the State Public
Charter School Facility Fund created by section 1 of this act.
H
-
*AB435*